Idaho, session 2025, S1100.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-1431, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-1431. MOTORCYCLE PROFILING. (1) No state or local law enforcement
agent or law enforcement agency shall engage in motorcycle profiling.
(2) For purposes of this section, "motorcycle profiling" means the ar-
bitrary use of the fact that a person rides a motorcycle or wears motorcy-
cle-related paraphernalia as a factor in deciding to stop and question, take
enforcement action, arrest, or search a person or vehicle under the consti-
tution of the United States or the constitution of the state of Idaho.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create a cause of ac-
tion against any individual, the state of Idaho, any counties or cities of
the state, or any law enforcement entity within the state.
(4) All state and local law enforcement agencies shall adopt a policy
prohibiting motorcycle profiling that is consistent with the provisions of
this section. A law enforcement agency shall distribute a copy of such pol-
icy to all of its law enforcement agents.
(5) The peace officer standards and training council established in
chapter 51, title 19, Idaho Code, shall include training regarding the
prohibition of motorcycle profiling as part of minimum basic training that
peace officers shall complete. Such training shall include reference to the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.